Utah statutes.
76-5-402.3.   Object rape of a child -- Penalty.
(1)  A person commits object rape of a child when the person causes the
penetration or touching, however slight, of the genital or anal opening of a
child who is under the age of 14 by any foreign object, substance, instrument,
or device, not including a part of the human body, with intent to cause
substantial emotional or bodily pain to the child or with the intent to arouse
or gratify the sexual desire of any person.
 (2)  Object rape of a child is a first degree felony punishable by a term of
imprisonment of:
(a)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(b) not less than 25 years and which
may be for life; or
(b)  life without parole, if the trier of fact finds that:
(i)  during the course of the commission of the object rape of a child the
defendant caused serious bodily injury to another; or
(ii)  at the time of the commission of the object rape of a child the
defendant was previously convicted of a grievous sexual offense.
(3)  Imprisonment under this section is mandatory in accordance with Section
76-3-406.
